Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1818
Personal injury
or death; situations for which compensation is permitted.

The committee or hearing officer may order the payment of compensation from the Victim's
Compensation Fund for personal injury or death which resulted
from:

(1) An attempt on the part
of the applicant to prevent the commission of crime, to apprehend a suspected
criminal, to aid or attempt to aid a police officer in the performance of
his or her duties, or to aid a victim of a crime; or

(2) The commission or attempt
on the part of one other than the applicant of an unlawful criminal act committed
or attempted in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 18;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 23.